Georgia, session 2025_26, HB376.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits for state income tax, is amended in
Code Section 48-7-29.8, relating to tax credits for the rehabilitation of historic structures, by
revising paragraph (5) of subsection (a) and subsections (b) and (c) as follows:
"(5) 'Substantial rehabilitation' means rehabilitation of a certified structure for which the
qualified rehabilitation expenditures, at least 5 percent of which must be allocable to the
exterior during the 24 month period selected by the taxpayer ending with or within the
taxable year, exceed:
H. B. 376 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 50 1202S
(A) For a historic home, the lesser of $25,000.00 or 50 percent of the adjusted basis of
the property as defined in subparagraph (a)(1)(B) of Code Section 48-5-7.2; or, in the
case of a historic home located in a target area, $5,000.00; or
(B) For any other certified structure, the greater of $5,000.00 $25,000.00 or the
adjusted basis of the property."
"(b)(1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a tax credit against the tax imposed by this chapter
in the year that the certified rehabilitation is placed in service, which may be up to two
years after the end of the taxable year for which the credit was originally reserved:
(1)(A) In the case of a historic home, equal to 25 percent of qualified rehabilitation
expenditures, except that, in the case of a historic home located within a target area, an
additional credit equal to 5 percent of qualified rehabilitation expenditures shall be
allowed; and
(2)(B) In the case of any other certified structure, equal to 25 20 percent of qualified
rehabilitation expenditures.
(2) Qualified rehabilitation expenditures may only be counted once in determining the
amount of the tax credit available, and more than one entity may shall not claim a credit
for the same qualified rehabilitation expenditures.
(c)(1) In no event shall credits for a historic home exceed $100,000.00 in any 120 month
period.
(2) The maximum credit for any other individual certified structure shall be $5 million
for any taxable year, except in the case that the project creates 200 or more full-time,
permanent jobs or $5 million in annual payroll within two years of the placed in service
date, in which case the project is eligible for credits up to $10 million for an individual
certified structure. In no event shall more than one application for any individual
certified structure under this paragraph be approved in any 120 month period.
(3)(A) In no event shall credits issued under this Code section for historic homes
exceed $5 million in aggregate per year.
H. B. 376 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 50 1202S
(B) In no event shall credits issued under this Code section for certified structures other
than historic homes exceed $30 $50 million in aggregate per year.
(C) On and after January 1, 2030, in no event shall credits be issued under this Code
section."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 376 (SUB)
- 3 -